Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6915
Preexisting condition, defined.

Preexisting condition means a condition whether physical or mental, regardless of the cause of the condition, for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received within the six-month period ending on the enrollment date. Genetic information shall not be treated as a condition for which a preexisting condition exclusion may be imposed in the absence of a diagnosis of the condition related to such information.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 15;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 40.